North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15.1 Elementary and Secondary Education
CHAPTER 15.1-21 Curriculum and Testing

15.1-21-01.
Elementary and middle schools — Required instruction.

In order to be approved by the superintendent of public instruction, each public and nonpublic elementary and middle school shall provide to students instruction in:

English language arts, including reading, composition, creative writing, English grammar, and spelling.

Mathematics.

Social studies, including:

The United States Constitution;

United States history;

Geography;

Government; and

North Dakota studies, with an emphasis on geography, history, the federally recognized Indian tribes in the state, and agriculture of this state, in the fourth and eighth grades.

Science, including agriculture.

Physical education.

Health, including physiology, hygiene, disease control, and the nature and effects of alcohol, tobacco, and narcotics.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8; 2007, ch. 174, § 1; 2021, ch. 153, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-02.
High schools — Required units.

In order to be approved by the superintendent of public instruction, each public and nonpublic high school shall provide instruction in or make available to each student:

Four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition, and speech;

Four units of mathematics, including:

One unit of algebra II; and

One unit for which algebra II is a prerequisite;

Four units of science, including:

One unit of physical science; and

One unit of biology;

Four units of social studies, including:

One unit of world history;

One unit of United States history, including Native American tribal history; and

One unit of problems of democracy; or

One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics;

One-half unit of health;

One-half unit of physical education during each school year, provided that once every four years the unit must be a concept-based fitness class that includes instruction in the assessment, improvement, and maintenance of personal fitness;

Two units of fine arts, at least one of which must be music;

Two units of the same foreign or native American language;

One unit of an advanced placement course or one unit of a dual-credit course; and

Two units of career and technical education from a coordinated plan of study recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

In addition to the requirements of subsection 1, each public and nonpublic high school shall make available to each student, at least once every two years, one-half unit of North Dakota studies, with an emphasis on the geography, history, and agriculture of this state.

Each unit which must be made available under this section must meet or exceed the state content standards, unless a school district or governing board of a nonpublic high school has adopted a mastery framework policy and awards units based on the successful completion of the relevant portions of the North Dakota learning continuum. A mastery framework policy adopted by a school district or governing board of a nonpublic high school must identify the portions of the North Dakota learning continuum which must be mastered for a student to attain units necessary for high school graduation under section 15.1-21-02.2.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “make available” means that:

Each public high school and nonpublic high school shall allow students to select units over the course of a high school career from a list that includes at least those required by this section;

If a student selects a unit from the list required by this section, the public high school or the nonpublic high school shall provide the unit to the student; and

The unit may be provided to the student through any delivery method not contrary to state law and may include classroom or individual instruction and distance learning options, including interactive video, computer instruction, correspondence courses, and postsecondary enrollment under chapter 15.1-25.

The board of a school district may not impose any fees or charges upon a student for the provision of or participation in units as provided in this section, other than the fees permitted by section 15.1-09-36.

If in order to meet the minimum requirements of this section a school district includes academic courses offered by a postsecondary institution under chapter 15.1-25, the school district shall:

Pay all costs of the student’s attendance, except those fees that are permissible under section 15.1-09-36; and

Transport the student to and from the location at which the course is offered or provide mileage reimbursement to the student if transportation is provided by the student or the student’s family.

The requirements of this section do not apply to alternative high schools or alternative high school education programs.

The requirements of subdivisions g and h of subsection 1 do not apply to the North Dakota youth correctional center.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 181, § 8; 2003 ch. 138, § 65; 2003 Sp., ch. 667, § 7; 2005, ch. 165, § 1; 2007, ch. 175, § 1; 2007, ch. 174, § 2; 2007, ch. 176, § 1; 2009, ch. 175, § 14; 2021, ch. 136, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 153, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2003 amendment of this section by
section 7 of chapter 667, S.L. 2003, Sp. becomes effective on July 1, 2005, pursuant to
section 42 of chapter 667, S.L. 2003, Sp.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 136, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2196; and Section 2 of Chapter 153, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2304.

15.1-21-02.1.
High school diploma — Minimum units.

Except as provided in section 15.1-21-02.3 or as otherwise agreed to in the compact on educational opportunity for military children, before a school district, a nonpublic high school, or the center for distance education issues a high school diploma to a student, the student must have successfully completed:

The twenty-two units of high school coursework set forth in section 15.1-21-02.2; and

Any additional units of high school coursework required by the issuing entity, two of which may be theological studies if taught in a nonpublic school by an approved theological studies instructor.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 160, § 1; 2007, ch. 156, § 8; 2007, ch. 177, § 1; 2009, ch. 175, § 15; 2011, ch. 129, § 3; 2011, ch. 137, § 2; 2011, ch. 147, § 9; 2013, ch. 146, § 6; 2017, ch. 57, § 4, effective August 1, 2017.

15.1-21-02.2.
High school graduation — Minimum requirements. [Effective through July 31, 2025]

Except as provided in section 15.1-21-02.3 and subsection 2, the following twenty-two units of high school coursework constitute the minimum requirement for high school graduation:

Four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition, and speech;

Three units of mathematics, which may include one unit of computer science approved by the superintendent of public instruction;

Three units of science, consisting of:

One unit of biology;

One unit of chemistry; and

One unit of physics; or

One unit of biology;

One unit of physical science; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other science;

Three units of social studies, including:

One unit of United States history;

One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics; or

One unit of problems of democracy; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other social studies, which may include civics, civilization, geography and history, multicultural studies, North Dakota studies, psychology, sociology, and world history;

One unit of physical education; or

One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;

Three units of:

Foreign languages;

Native American languages;

Fine arts; or

Career and technical education courses; and

Any five additional units.

If approved by the board of a school district or nonpublic school, a school district or nonpublic school may develop eligibility criteria or programmatic requirements to allow a passing score on the relevant portions of the GED assessment to receive credit for the corresponding requirements of subdivisions a through d of subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 177, § 2.; 2017, ch. 140, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 141, § 1, effective August 1, 2017.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02.2 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 147, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2147; and Section 3 of Chapter 153, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2304.

Section 15.1-21-02.2 was amended 2 times by the 2017 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 141, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2185; and Section 1 of Chapter 140, Session Laws 2017, Senate Bill 2091.

15.1-21-02.2.
High school graduation — Minimum requirements.
[Effective August 1, 2025]

Except as provided in section 15.1-21-02.3 and subsection 2, the following twenty-two units of high school coursework constitute the minimum requirement for high school graduation:

Four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition, and speech;

Three units of mathematics, which may include one unit of computer science approved by the superintendent of public instruction;

Three units of science, consisting of:

One unit of biology;

One unit of chemistry; and

One unit of physics; or

One unit of biology;

One unit of physical science; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other science;

Three units of social studies, including:

One unit of United States history, including Native American tribal history;

One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics; or

One unit of problems of democracy; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other social studies, which may include civics, civilization, geography and history, multicultural studies, North Dakota studies, psychology, sociology, and world history;

One unit of physical education; or

One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;

Three units of:

Foreign languages;

Native American languages;

Fine arts; or

Career and technical education courses; and

Any five additional units.

If approved by the board of a school district or nonpublic school, a school district or nonpublic school may develop eligibility criteria or programmatic requirements to allow a passing score on the relevant portions of the GED assessment to receive credit for the corresponding requirements of subdivisions a through d of subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 177, § 2.; 2017, ch. 140, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 141, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 154, § 1, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 153, § 3, effective August 1, 2025.

15.1-21-02.3.
Optional high school curriculum — Requirements.

If after completing at least two years of high school a student has failed to pass at least one-half unit from three subdivisions in subsection 1 of section 15.1-21-02.2 or has a grade point average at or below the twenty-fifth percentile of other students in the district who are enrolled in the same grade, the student may request the student’s career advisor, guidance counselor, or principal meet with the student and the student’s parent to determine whether the student should be permitted to pursue an optional high school curriculum, in place of the requirements set forth in section 15.1-21-02.2. If a student’s parent consents in writing to the student pursuing the optional high school curriculum, the student is eligible to receive a high school diploma upon completing the following requirements:

Four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition, and speech;

Two units of mathematics;

Two units of science;

Three units of social studies, which may include up to one-half unit of North Dakota studies and one-half unit of multicultural studies;

One unit of physical education; or

One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;

Two units of:

Foreign languages;

Native American languages;

Fine arts; or

Career and technical education courses; and

Any seven additional units.

If approved by the board of a school district or nonpublic school, a school district or nonpublic school may develop eligibility criteria or programmatic requirements to allow a passing score on the relevant portions of the GED assessment to receive credit for the corresponding requirements of subdivisions a through d of subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 16; 2021, ch. 154, § 2, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-02.4.
North Dakota career and technical education scholarship.
[Repealed effective July 31, 2024]

Any resident student who graduates from a high school during or after the 2010-11 school year and any resident student who completes a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23 during or after the 2012-13 school year is eligible to receive a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship provided the student:

Completed four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition, and speech;

Completed three units of mathematics, including:

One unit of algebra II, integrated mathematics II, or integrated mathematics III, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction; and

Two units of any other mathematics, which may include one unit of computer science;

Completed three units of science, consisting of:

One unit of biology;

One unit of chemistry; and

One unit of physics; or

One unit of biology;

One unit of physical science; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other science;

Completed three units of social studies, including:

One unit of United States history;

One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics; or

One unit of problems of democracy; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other social studies, which may include civics, civilization, geography and history, multicultural studies, North Dakota studies, psychology, sociology, and world history;

Completed one unit of physical education; or

One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;

Completed:

One unit selected from:

Foreign languages;

Native American languages;

American sign language;

Fine arts; or

Career and technical education courses; and

Two units of a coordinated plan of study recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction or an education pathway approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The education pathway must consist of one unit in teaching profession and educational methodology and at least one additional unit in advanced placement or dual-credit psychology, child development, peer-to-peer leadership, or child-related careers;

Completed any five additional units, two of which must be in the area of career and technical education;

(a) Obtained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, based on all high school units in which the student was enrolled; and

Obtained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, based only on the units required by subsections 1 through 7; and

Obtained a grade of at least “C” in each unit or one-half unit, except as provided under subsection 2; and

Received:

A composite score of at least twenty-four on an ACT or an equivalent score on a nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education; or

A score of at least five on each of three WorkKeys assessments or an equivalent score on a nationally recognized standardized test, recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction.

A resident high school student is exempt from the requirements in subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subdivision h of subsection 1 and subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of subdivision h of subsection 1 for units earned during a semester, quarter, or term that includes March, April, or May of 2020.

(b)

Obtained a grade of at least “C” in each unit or one-half unit, except as provided under subsection 2; or

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 17; 2011, ch. 147, § 11; 2013, ch. 156, § 1; 2017, ch. 140, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 141, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 167, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 167, § 2, effective August 21, 2021; 2021, ch. 155, § 1, effective March 26, 2021; 2021, ch. 156, § 1, effective August 21, 2021; 2021, ch. 157, § 1, effective March 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 158, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 553, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

15.1-21-02.4.
North Dakota career and technical education scholarship. [Repealed effective July 31, 2024]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 17; 2011, ch. 147, § 11; 2013, ch. 156, § 1; 2017, ch. 140, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 141, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 167, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 167, § 2, effective August 21, 2021; 2021, ch. 155, § 1, effective March 26, 2021; 2021, ch. 156, § 1, effective August 21, 2021; 2021, ch. 157, § 1, effective March 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 158, § 3, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 553, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.

15.1-21-02.5.
North Dakota academic scholarship. [Repealed effective July 31, 2024]

Any resident student who graduates from a high school during or after the 2010-11 school year and any resident student who completes a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23 during or after the 2012-13 school year is eligible to receive a North Dakota academic scholarship provided the student:

Completed four units of English language arts from a sequence that includes literature, composition, and speech;

Completed three units of mathematics, including:

One unit of algebra II, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction;

One unit of mathematics for which algebra II, as defined by the superintendent of public instruction, is a prerequisite; and

One unit of any other mathematics, which may include computer science;

Completed three units of science, consisting of:

One unit of biology;

One unit of chemistry; and

One unit of physics; or

One unit of biology;

One unit of physical science; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other science;

Completed three units of social studies, including:

One unit of United States history;

One-half unit of United States government and one-half unit of economics; or

One unit of problems of democracy; and

One unit or two one-half units of any other social studies, which may include civics, civilization, geography and history, multicultural studies, North Dakota studies, psychology, sociology, and world history;

Completed one unit of physical education; or

One-half unit of physical education and one-half unit of health;

Completed two units of:

The same foreign language;

The same native American language;

American sign language; or

Career and technical education from a coordinated plan of study recommended by the department of career and technical education and approved by the superintendent of public instruction or an education pathway, approved by the superintendent of public instruction. The education pathway must consist of one-unit in teaching profession and educational methodology and at least one additional unit in advanced placement or dual-credit psychology, child development, peer-to-peer leadership, or child-related careers; and

One unit selected from:

Foreign languages;

Native American languages;

American sign language;

Fine arts; or

Career and technical education;

Completed any five additional units;

(a) Obtained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, or an equivalent course proficiency score if the student was enrolled in a school district participating in an approved innovative education program under section 15.1-06-08.2 and the school district obtained a waiver under section 15.1-06-08.1, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, based on all high school units in which the student was enrolled; and

Obtained a cumulative grade point average of at least 3.0 on a 4.0 grading scale, or an equivalent course proficiency score if the student was enrolled in a school district participating in an approved innovative education program under section 15.1-06-08.2 and the school district obtained a waiver under section 15.1-06-08.1, as determined by the superintendent of public instruction, based only on the units required by subsections 1 through 7; and

Obtained a grade of at least “C”, or an equivalent course proficiency score, in each unit or one-half unit, except as provided under subsection 2;

Received a composite score of at least twenty-four on an ACT or an equivalent score on a nationally recognized standardized test approved by the state board of higher education; and

Fulfilled any one unit requirement set forth in subsections 1 through 7 by means of an advanced placement course and examination;

Fulfilled any one unit requirement set forth in subsections 1 through 4 or 6 by completion, through an early entrance program, of a nonremedial postsecondary course offered for credit at an accredited institution of higher education which has a physical presence in this state; or

Fulfilled any one-half unit requirement set forth in subsections 1 through 7 by means of a dual-credit course.

A resident high school student is exempt from the requirements in subparagraph b of paragraph 1 of subdivision h of subsection 1 and subparagraph b of paragraph 2 of subdivision h of subsection 1 for units earned during a semester, quarter, or term that includes March, April, or May of 2020.

(b)

Obtained a grade of at least “C”, or an equivalent course proficiency score, in each unit or one-half unit, except as provided under subsection 2; or

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 18; 2011, ch. 147, § 12; 2013, ch. 156, § 2; 2013, ch. 157, § 1; 2015, ch. 149, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 140, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 141, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 167, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 155, § 2, effective March 25, 2021; 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 157, § 2, effective March 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 158, § 4, effective August 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 149, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

15.1-21-02.5.
North Dakota academic scholarship. [Repealed effective July 31, 2024]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 18; 2011, ch. 147, § 12; 2013, ch. 156, § 2; 2013, ch. 157, § 1; 2015, ch. 149, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 140, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2017, ch. 141, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 167, § 3, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 155, § 2, effective March 25, 2021; 2021, ch. 156, § 2, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 157, § 2, effective March 22, 2021; 2021, ch. 158, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; repealed by 2021, ch. 159, § 10, effective July 31, 2024.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02.5 was amended 4 times and repealed by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is treated as repealed. Section 2 of Chapter 156, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1135; Section 2 of Chapter 155, Session Laws 2021, House Bill 1083; Section 2 of Chapter 157, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2136; Section 4 of chapter 158, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2141; and Section 10 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289.

15.1-21-02.6.
North Dakota scholarship — Amount — Applicability. [Effective through July 31, 2024]

The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible by the superintendent of public instruction either a North Dakota academic scholarship or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in the amount of seven hundred fifty dollars for each semester during which the student is enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence in this state, maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress toward program completion.

The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible by the superintendent of public instruction either a North Dakota academic scholarship or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in the amount of five hundred dollars for each quarter or clock-hour term during which the student is enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence in this state or an accredited private career school with a physical presence in this state, maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress toward program completion.

The state board shall monitor each scholarship recipient to ensure that the student meets the academic and other requirements of this section. Upon determining that a recipient student has failed to meet the requirements of this section, the board shall provide notification to the student within ten business days.

A student is not entitled to receive more than six thousand dollars under this section.

The state board of higher education shall forward the scholarship directly to the institution in which the student is enrolled.

This section does not require a student to be enrolled in consecutive semesters

A scholarship under this section is valid only for six academic years after the student’s graduation from high school and may be applied to a graduate or professional program.

A scholarship under this section is available to any eligible resident student who fulfills the requirements of section 15.1-21-02.4 or 15.1-21-02.5 and who:

Graduates from a high school in this state;

Graduates from a high school in a bordering state under chapter 15.1-29;

Graduates from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a custodial parent in this state; or

Completes a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23.

For purposes of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, “full-time” has the same meaning as the term is defined by the institution the student is attending.

A student who is enrolled less than full-time may retain scholarship eligibility if the student is in the final semester, quarter, or clock-hour term before program completion. The waiver of the full-time enrollment status requirement for scholarship eligibility may not apply to a student more than once.

For the purpose of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, “progress toward program completion” means earning the following minimum number of credits after each semester, quarter, or clock-hour term disbursement to qualify for the subsequent disbursement:

Twenty-four credits after disbursement two;

Thirty-nine credits after disbursement three;

Fifty-four credits after disbursement four;

Sixty-nine credits after disbursement five;

Eighty-four credits after disbursement six; and

Ninety-nine credits after disbursement seven.

For purposes of scholarship eligibility under this section, “clock-hour term” has the same meaning as the term is defined by the state board of higher education. The state board of higher education shall determine the conversion of:

Clock hours to credit hours; and

Percentage-based grading to grade point average.

, quarters, or clock-hour terms.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 19; 2011, ch. 143, § 1; 2011, ch. 147, § 13; 2013, ch. 156, § 3; 2013, ch. 157, § 2; 2015, ch. 150, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 151, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 142, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 38, § 19, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 159, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 157, § 3, effective March 22, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 150, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment of this section by
section 1 of chapter 151, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2013 amendment of this section by section 3 of chapter 156, S.L. 2013 became effective April 30, 2013, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 4 of ch. 156, S.L. 2013.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02.6 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 1 of Chapter 151, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2075; and Section 1 of Chapter 150, Session Laws 2015, Senate Bill 2074.

15.1-21-02.6.
North Dakota scholarship — Amount — Applicability. [Effective August 1, 2024]

The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship, a North Dakota academic scholarship, or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in the amount of seven hundred fifty dollars for each semester during which the student is enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence in this state, maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress toward program completion.

The state board of higher education shall provide to any student certified as being eligible by the superintendent of public instruction a North Dakota scholarship, a North Dakota academic scholarship, or a North Dakota career and technical education scholarship in the amount of five hundred dollars for each quarter or clock-hour term during which the student is enrolled full time at an accredited institution of higher education with a physical presence in this state or an accredited private career school with a physical presence in this state, maintains a cumulative grade point average of 2.75, and maintains progress toward program completion.

The state board shall monitor each scholarship recipient to ensure the student meets the academic and other requirements of this section. Upon determining a recipient student has failed to meet the requirements of this section, the board shall provide notification to the student within ten business days.

A student is not entitled to receive more than six thousand dollars under this section.

The state board of higher education shall forward the scholarship directly to the institution in which the student is enrolled.

A scholarship under this section is valid only for six academic years after the student’s graduation from high school and may be applied to a graduate or professional program.

A scholarship under this section is available to any eligible resident student who fulfills the requirements of section 15.1-21-02.4, section 15.1-21-02.5, or 15.1-21-02.10 and who:

Graduates from a high school in this state;

Graduates from a high school in a bordering state under chapter 15.1-29;

Graduates from a nonpublic high school in a bordering state while residing with a custodial parent in this state; or

Completes a program of home education supervised in accordance with chapter 15.1-23.

For purposes of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, “full-time” has the same meaning as the term is defined by the institution the student is attending.

A student who is enrolled less than full-time may retain scholarship eligibility if the student is in the final semester, , quarter, or clock-hour term before program completion. The waiver of the full-time enrollment status requirement for scholarship eligibility may not apply to a student more than once.

For the purpose of North Dakota scholarship eligibility under this section, “progress toward program completion” means earning the following minimum number of credits after each semester, quarter, or clock-hour term disbursement to qualify for the subsequent disbursement:

Twenty-four credits after disbursement two;

Thirty-nine credits after disbursement three;

Fifty-four credits after disbursement four;

Sixty-nine credits after disbursement five;

Eighty-four credits after disbursement six; and

Ninety-nine credits after disbursement seven.

For purposes of scholarship eligibility under this section, "clock hour term" has the same meaning as the term is defined by the state board of higher education. The state board of higher education shall determine the conversion of:

Clock hours to credit hours; and

Percentage based grading to grade point average.

This section does not require a student to be enrolled in consecutive semesters, quarters, or clock-hour terms.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 19; 2011, ch. 143, § 1; 2011, ch. 147, § 13; 2013, ch. 156, § 3; 2013, ch. 157, § 2; 2015, ch. 150, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2015, ch. 151, § 1, effective August 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 142, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 38, § 19, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 159, § 4, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 159, § 5, effective August 1, 2024.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02.6 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 3 of Chapter 157, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2136; Section 4 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289; and Section 5 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289.

15.1-21-02.7.
North Dakota scholarship opportunities — 2009-10 high school graduates. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 175, § 20; repealed by 2021, ch. 139, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

15.1-21-02.8.
North Dakota scholarship — Eligibility — One-time exception. [Effective through July 31, 2024]

Notwithstanding section 15.1-21-02.6, if a student’s cumulative grade point average as determined by the state board of higher education at the conclusion of a semester, quarter, or clock-hour term is below 2.75, the board shall grant an exception and provide the North Dakota scholarship to which the student would otherwise be entitled for the next semester, quarter, or clock-hour term in which the student is enrolled full time. The exception provided by this section is applicable to a student only one time.

If a student’s cumulative grade point average as determined by the state board of higher education at the conclusion of a semester, quarter, or clock-hour term is below 2.75 for a second time, the student is no longer eligible to receive a North Dakota, North Dakota academic, or North Dakota career and technical education scholarship.

For purposes of scholarship eligibility under this section, “clock-hour term” has the same meaning as the term is defined by the state board of higher education. The state board of higher education shall determine the conversion of:

Clock hours to credit hours; and

Percentage-based grading to grade point average .

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 14; 2021, ch. 157, § 4, effective March 23, 2021; 2021, ch. 159, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02.8 was amended 3 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 157, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2136; Section 6 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289; and Section 7 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289.

15.1-21-02.8.
North Dakota scholarship — Eligibility — One-time exception. [Effective August 1, 2024]

Notwithstanding section 15.1-21-02.6, if a student’s cumulative grade point average as determined by the state board of higher education at the conclusion of a semester, quarter, or clock-hour term is below 2.75, the board shall grant an exception and provide the North Dakota scholarship to which the student would otherwise be entitled for the next semester, quarter, or clock-hour term in which the student is enrolled full time. The exception provided by this section is applicable to a student only one time.

If a student’s cumulative grade point average as determined by the state board of higher education at the conclusion of a semester, quarter, or clock-hour term is below 2.75 for a second time, the student is no longer eligible to receive a North Dakota scholarship.

For purposes of scholarship eligibility under this section, “clock-hour term” has the same meaning as the term is defined by the state board of higher education. The state board of higher education shall determine the conversion of:

Clock hours to credit hours; and

Percentage-based grading to grade point average.

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 147, § 14; 2021, ch. 157, § 4, effective March 23, 2021; 2021, ch. 159, § 6, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 159, § 7, effective August 1, 2024.

15.1-21-02.9.
North Dakota scholarship — Information system. [Effective through July 31, 2024]

Each school district shall use North Dakota eTranscripts, or an alternative information system designated by the information technology department in collaboration with the department of public instruction, to submit official transcripts for the North Dakota, North Dakota academic, or North Dakota career and technical education scholarship to the superintendent of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 159, § 8, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 15.1-21-02.9 was amended 2 times by the 2021 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 8 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289; and Section 9 of Chapter 159, Session Laws 2021, Senate Bill 2289.

15.1-21-02.9.
North Dakota scholarship — Information system. [Effective August 1, 2024]

Each school district shall use North Dakota eTranscripts, or an alternative information system designated by the information technology department in collaboration with the department of public instruction, to submit official transcripts for the North Dakota scholarship to the superintendent of public instruction.

Source:

S.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 159, § 8, effective August 1, 2021; 2021, ch. 159, § 9, effective August 1, 2024.